Alabama, session 2026rs, HB316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) FIREARM. The term as defined in Section 13A-8-1,
Page 1

(1) FIREARM. The term as defined in Section 13A-8-1,
HB316 INTRODUCED
Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) MINOR. An individual that is 18 years of age or
younger.
(3) PUBLIC SCHOOL. A public school composed of grades
K-12, including a public school bus used for grades K-12.
(4) REASONABLY SECURE. Includes, but is not limited to,
storing a firearm using a trigger lock or in a locked box or
gun safe that requires a key, numerical or alphanumerical
combination, or fingerprint to open.
(b) A parent or legal guardian of a minor shall store a
firearm in his or her possession or under his or her control
in a manner that reasonably secures the firearm from
unauthorized or unlawful access by a minor.
(c) If a minor gains access to a firearm and unlawfully
possesses the firearm on the premises of a public school as a
proximate result of a violation of subsection (b), the parent
or legal guardian is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(d) This section shall not apply to any of the
following:
(1) A minor in possession of a firearm pursuant to
Section 13A-11-72 (f) or (g), Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) A minor in possession of a firearm that is in a
motor vehicle while the vehicle is in a parking area owned or
operated by a public school.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2